Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2503.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 62 of Title 12 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER E.1RETURN AND REFUND OF MOTOR VEHICLESSec.6265.1. Definitions.6265.2. Disclosure.6265.3. Refund by dealer.6265.4. Civil cause of action.6265.5. Nonwaiver of subchapter.§ 6265.1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter 1234567891011121314151617 shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Dealer." A person in the business of buying, selling, leasing or exchanging vehicles in this Commonwealth."Purchaser." A person, or a successor or assignee, who has obtained possession or ownership of a used motor vehicle by lease, transfer or purchase or who has entered into an agreement or contract for the lease or purchase of a used motor vehicle which is used, leased or bought for use primarily for personal, family or household purposes.§ 6265.2. Disclosure.The Attorney General shall transmit notice of a statement that explains the duty of the dealer under this subchapter to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The dealer shall provide to the purchaser, at the time of sale of a motor vehicle by the dealer, a copy of the Attorney General's statement and a listing of zone offices, with addresses and phone numbers, that may be contacted by the purchaser for the purpose of seeking relief provided in this subchapter.§ 6265.3. Refund by dealer.(a) Duty of dealer.--A dealer that sells or leases a motor vehicle registered in this Commonwealth, upon notice from the purchaser and no later than 10 days after the purchase or lease, shall:(1) accept the return of the vehicle from the purchaser; and(2) either:(i) refund to the purchaser the full purchase price or lease price, including all collateral charges, less a 20260HB2503PN3389 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reasonable allowance for the purchaser's use of the vehicle not exceeding the lesser of 10¢ per mile driven or 10% of the purchase price or lease price of the vehicle; or(ii) if the vehicle sustains damage during the purchaser's use of the vehicle, and the dealer knew or should have known that the damage may occur, be permitted to retain a reasonable allowance so long as the damage does not substantially affect the use or safety of the motor vehicle.(b) Form of refund.--The dealer shall pay the refund or reasonable allowance under subsection (a) to the purchaser and any lienholder as the interests may appear. A reasonable allowance for use shall be that amount directly attributable to use by the purchaser's note under subsection (a).(c) Time for refund.--The dealer shall pay the refund or reasonable allowance under subsection (a) no later than 30 days after the date the purchaser provides notice to the dealer.(d) Duty of purchaser to return vehicle.--The purchaser must return the motor vehicle to the dealer to obtain a refund or reasonable allowance under subsection (a). If, due to reasons of size and weight or method of attachment or method of installation, the purchaser cannot reasonably return the motor vehicle, the purchaser shall notify the dealer in writing. Written notice to the dealer shall constitute a return of the vehicle if the purchaser is unable to return the vehicle. Upon receipt of the notice, the dealer shall arrange for transport of the vehicle. All costs of transporting the vehicle, if the purchaser is unable to effect return, shall be at the purchaser's expense.20260HB2503PN3389 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) Forfeiture of refund.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), a purchaser is not entitled to a refund if the condition of the motor vehicle is substantially different from the condition of the motor vehicle at the time of purchase and the condition affects the substantial use or safety of the vehicle.(2) If the motor vehicle sustains damage that affects the substantial use or safety of the vehicle, and the dealer knew or should have reasonably foreseen that the vehicle was in a condition, at the time of purchase or lease of the vehicle, that could damage or affect the substantial use or safety of the vehicle, the purchaser is entitled to a full refund of the contract price and collateral charges.§ 6265.4. Civil cause of action.(a) Remedies.--A purchaser of a motor vehicle who purchases the motor vehicle from a dealer and suffers a loss as a result of the dealer's failure to comply with this subchapter may bring a civil action in a court of common pleas, in addition to other relief. The purchaser shall be entitled to recover reasonable attorney fees and all court costs in addition to remedies under this subsection.(b) Violation.--A violation of this subchapter shall be considered a violation of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law. Nothing in this subchapter shall limit the purchaser from pursuing a right or remedy under any other law, contract or warranty.§ 6265.5. Nonwaiver of subchapter.The provisions of this subchapter may not be waived by the dealer, purchaser or lienholder of the motor vehicle.20260HB2503PN3389 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. This act shall apply to motor vehicles purchased after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20260HB2503PN3389 - 5 - 123